Washington statutes.
RCW 18.59.130

Board—Powers and duties—Rules.

(1) The board shall administer, coordinate, and enforce this chapter, evaluate qualifications under this chapter, and provide for supervision of examinations of applicants for licensure under this chapter.

(2) The board may adopt such rules as it deems necessary in the administration of this chapter.

[ 1986 c 259 s 102; 1984 c 9 s 14.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 259: See note following RCW 18.130.010.